Massachusetts, session 194th, S911.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of Chapter 176Q of the General Laws is hereby amended by
striking subsection (b) in its entirety and replacing it with the following:-
(b) There shall be a board, with duties and powers established by this chapter, which shall
govern the connector. The connector board shall consist of 13 members: the secretary for
administration and finance, or a designee, who shall serve as chairperson; the director of
Medicaid or a designee; the commissioner of insurance or a designee; the executive director of
the group insurance commission; 6 members appointed by the governor, 1 of whom shall be a
member in good standing of the American Academy of Actuaries, 1 of whom shall be a health
economist, 1 of whom shall represent the interests of small businesses, 2 of whom shall be from
organizations representing employers, and 1 of whom shall be a member of the Massachusetts
of 2

chapter of the National Association of Health Underwriters; and 3 members appointed by the
attorney general, 1 of whom shall be an employee health benefits plan specialist, 1 of whom shall
be a representative of a health consumer organization and 1 of whom shall be a representative of
organized labor. No appointee shall be an employee of any licensed carrier authorized to do
business in the commonwealth. All appointments shall serve a term of 3 years, but a person
appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve only for the unexpired term. An appointed member of the
board shall be eligible for reappointment. The board shall annually elect 1 of its members to
serve as vice-chairperson.
SECTION 2. Said Chapter 176Q, as so appearing, is hereby amended by inserting after
section 18 the following two new sections:-
176Q:19 Health Connector Transparency
Section 19. The connector shall be subject to the open meeting law as established under
G.L.c. 30A, §§18-25 and subject to public records request as established under G.L.c. 66. A
public record for purposes of this section shall include but not be limited to board votes, meeting
minutes, financial records, contract, and staff salaries. This information shall also be made
publicly available on the website of the connector.
176Q:20 Return on Investment
Section 20. The secretary of administration and finance shall on an annual basis review
and evaluate the return on investments made by the connector. Said review and evaluation along
with any recommendations shall be filed with the clerks of the house and senate, the house and
senate committee on ways, and joint committee on health care financing no later than December
31 annually.
of 2